Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1837
Authority; financing obligations completed; convey title.

When the principal of and interest on bonds of the authority issued to finance the cost of a particular project or projects for an elementary or secondary school, including any refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance such bonds, have been fully paid and retired or when adequate provision has been made to fully pay and retire the same, and all other conditions of the bond resolution authorizing the same have been satisfied and the lien created by such bond resolution has been released in accordance with the provisions thereof, the authority shall promptly do such things and execute such deeds, conveyances, and other instruments, if any, as are necessary and required to convey title of such project or projects to such elementary or secondary school.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 37.